Utah statutes.
70A-11-102.   Preservation of old transition provision.

The provisions of Subsection 70A-10-102(2) shall continue to apply to the corrected Uniform Commercial Code and for this purpose the old Uniform Commercial Code and corrected Uniform Commercial Code shall be considered one continuous statute.



Enacted by Chapter 272, 1977 General Session

